Illinois, session 104th, HB3339.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 8by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 9exempt from inspection and copying:10        (a) All information determined to be confidential 11    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 12    Development Act.13        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 14    library users with specific materials under the Library 15    Records Confidentiality Act.16        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 17    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 19    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 21    has received.22        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   HB3339 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   HB3339 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   HB3339 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 2    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   HB3339 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 26    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent   HB3339 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   HB3339 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB3339 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   HB3339 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 3    information used and collected by the Illinois State 4    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 5    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 6    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 7    July 1, 2028 2025. 8        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 9    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 10    Agency Licensing Act. 11        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 12    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 13    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 14    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 15    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 16    Act. 17        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 18    the School Safety Drill Act. 19        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 20    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 21        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 22    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 23    Act. 24        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2-3.196 of the School Code. 26        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB3339 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 2    Power Agency Act. 3        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 4    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 5    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 6        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 7    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 8    Act. 9        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 10    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 11    Act. 12        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 13    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 14        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 16    Transmission Modernization Act. 17        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.19(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 218-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 22102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 236-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 25103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 267-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786,   HB3339 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 2103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 3    Section 10. The Expressway Camera Act is amended by 4changing Sections 3, 5, and 90 and by adding Section 10 as 5follows: 6    (605 ILCS 140/3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)8    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Aggravated vehicular hijacking" has the meaning provided 10in Section 18-4 of the Criminal Code of 2012.11    "Authorized user" means a designated peace officer or 12member of law enforcement personnel who has received training 13in the review and use of images and associated technology. 14    "Expressway" has the meaning provided in Section 1-119.3 15of the Illinois Vehicle Code.16    "Forcible felony" means the following offenses as defined 17in the Criminal Code of 2012 or substantially similar federal 18or other state criminal laws: treason, first degree murder, 19second degree murder, predatory criminal sexual assault of a 20child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 21assault, trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 22robbery, burglary, residential burglary, aggravated arson, 23arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, and aggravated battery 24resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or   HB3339 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1disfigurement. 2    "Terrorism" has the meaning provided in Section 29D-14.9 3of the Criminal Code of 2012. 4    "Vehicular hijacking" has the meaning provided in Section 518-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.6(Source: P.A. 102-1042, eff. 6-3-22.) 7    (605 ILCS 140/5)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)9    Sec. 5. Camera program. 10    (a) The Illinois State Police, the Illinois Department of 11Transportation, and the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority 12shall work together to conduct a program to increase the 13amount of cameras along (i) expressways and the State highway 14system in the counties of Boone, Bureau, Champaign, Cook, 15DeKalb, DuPage, Grundy, Henry, Kane, Kendall, Lake, LaSalle, 16Lee, Macon, Madison, McHenry, Morgan, Ogle, Peoria, Rock 17Island, Sangamon, St. Clair, Whiteside, Will, and Winnebago 18and (ii) Jean-Baptiste Pointe DuSable Lake Shore Drive in Cook 19County. Within 90 days after June 3, 2022 (the effective date 20of Public Act 102-1042), details about the program objectives, 21counties where the program is operational, and policies under 22which the program operates shall be made publicly available 23and posted online.24    (b) Images from the cameras, including, but not limited 25to, images of license plates collected by state-operated   HB3339 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1cameras and cameras operated by the Illinois State Toll 2Highway Authority, may be used by any law enforcement agency 3conducting an active law enforcement investigation subject to 4the limitations in this subsection. Images from the cameras 5may be extracted by any authorized user and used by any 6municipal police department, county sheriff's office, State 7Police officer, or other law enforcement agency with 8jurisdiction in the investigation of any offenses involving 9vehicular hijacking, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 10terrorism, motor vehicle theft, or any forcible felony, 11including, but not limited to, offenses involving the use of a 12firearm; to detect expressway hazards and highway conditions; 13and to facilitate highway safety and incident management. 14Images from the cameras shall not be used to enforce petty 15offenses or offenses not listed in this subsection, unless use 16of the images pertains to expressway or highway safety or 17hazards. Images from the cameras may be used by any law 18enforcement agency conducting an active law enforcement 19investigation. All images from the cameras that are exported 20through a law enforcement database shall be deleted from that 21law enforcement database within 120 days, unless the images 22are relevant to an ongoing investigation or pending criminal 23trial. Cameras shall not be used to monitor individuals or 24groups in a discriminatory manner contrary to applicable State 25or federal law. 26    (b-5) By August 1st June 30th of each year, the Illinois   HB3339 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b1State Police, the Illinois Department of Transportation, and 2the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority shall issue a joint 3report to the General Assembly detailing the program 4operations, including, but not limited to: 5        (1) the cost of installation of cameras by county; 6        (2) the cost of ongoing maintenance of the camera 7    systems per county, including electrical costs and data 8    transfer costs;9        (3) the number of inquiries where the investigation 10    involved the criminal offenses outlined in subsection (b); 11    and12        (4) the number of incidents in which law enforcement 13    searched the stored data for the criminal offenses 14    outlined in subsection (b). 15    (c) Subject to appropriation, any funds needed to conduct 16the program for use on the expressways or State highway system 17under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation 18shall be taken from the Road Fund and shall be included in 19requests for qualification processes. Any funds needed to 20conduct the program for use on expressways under the 21jurisdiction of the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority 22shall be paid for by funds from the Illinois State Tollway 23Highway Authority and shall be included in requests for 24qualification processes.25    (c-5) Any forcible felony, gunrunning, or firearms 26trafficking offense, as defined in Section 2-8, 24-3a, or   HB3339 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 11411 LNS 21499 b124-3b of the Criminal Code of 2012, respectively, committed on 2an expressway monitored by a camera system funded by money 3from the Road Fund or money from the Illinois State Toll 4Highway Authority and investigated by officers of the Illinois 5State Police may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or the 6State's Attorney where the offense was committed. 7    (d) (Blank).8(Source: P.A. 102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1043, eff. 6-3-22; 9103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 10    (605 ILCS 140/10 new)11    Sec. 10. Controlling law. This Act supersedes Section 19.1 12of the Toll Highway Act. This Act does not supersede Section 132-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 14    (605 ILCS 140/90)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)16    Sec. 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed on July 1, 2028 2025.17(Source: P.A. 101-42, eff. 1-1-20; 102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 18102-1043, eff. 6-3-22.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.